Vermont statutes. Title 31 Recreation and Sports
Subchapter 1. Circuses, Menageries, and Similar Shows

§ 401.
Permits and fees.

A selectboard may permit the exhibition in its town of any show mentioned in

32 V.S.A. §§ 9905

and 9906, on payment by the owners or operators thereof, for the use of the town, of not more than $100.00 nor less than $10.00 for every day on which exhibitions are given in such town.

§ 402.
Revocation of permit.

If, during the exhibition of a show under such license, the selectboard is satisfied that such exhibition disturbs the public peace, it may give notice in writing to the owner or operator thereof that the license is revoked.
If, after such notice, such exhibition is not immediately suspended, the owner or operator shall be subject to the same penalty as if he or she had exhibited without a license.

§ 403.
Penalties imposed on town officers.

Town clerks, selectboards, village trustees, or any other town or city officials shall be fined not more than $10.00 for issuing a permit or license to the owner or operator of a show mentioned in this chapter for less than the minimum fee prescribed for the use of the town in section 401 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 20, 1968;

2013, No. 34

, § 21;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 72.

§ 404.
Exhibiting without State and town licenses.

A person who gives or attempts to give an exhibition in a town of a show mentioned in

32 V.S.A. §§ 9901-9910

without first having obtained permission of the selectboard of such town therefor and without having received from the Secretary of State the license as provided in

32 V.S.A. §§ 9901-9910

, shall be fined not more than $3,000.00 nor less than $1,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 20, 1968.

§ 405.
Permits to exhibit natural curiosities.

A selectboard may permit a person to exhibit living animals and other natural curiosities for not more than two days at one time on payment of not more than $50.00 nor less than $10.00 by such person to the selectboard for the use of the town.

§ 406.
Exhibition without license.

A person who for reward or gain or under color of a gratuity suffers premises under his or her control to be used for the exhibition of a circus, living animals, and natural curiosities or exhibits a living animal or natural curiosity without having previously obtained such permission shall be fined not more than $200.00.

§ 407.
[Omitted.]